Maryland, session 2026, HB1357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 14–1330 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
– 1 –

Ch. 241 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14–1330.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONFIDENTIAL SUBSTANCE” MEANS ANY INGREDIENT:
(I) FOR WHICH A CLAIM HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE U.S.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY FOR INCLUSION ON THE CONFIDENTIAL
PORTION OF THE FEDERAL TOXIC SUBSTANCES CONTROL ACT CHEMICAL
SUBSTANCE INVENTORY;
(II) FOR WHICH THE MANUFACTURER OF THE MENSTRUAL
PRODUCT OR THE SUPPLIER OF THE INGREDIENT CLAIMS PROTECTION UNDER THE
FEDERAL DEFEND TRADE SECRETS ACT; OR
(III) THAT IS GENERALLY RECOGNIZED AS SAFE BY THE U. S.
FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION UNDER 21 C.F.R. § 170.30.
(2) “DIVISION” MEANS THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION
OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) (3) “INGREDIENT” MEANS ANY INTENTIONALLY
INTENTIONALLY ADDED SUBSTANCE IN A MENSTRUAL HYGIENE PRODUCT THAT
SERVES A TECHNICAL OR FUNCTIONAL PURPOSE IN THE FINISHED PRODUCT,
INCLUDING ANY FRAGRANCE OR COLORING.
(3) (4) “MENSTRUAL HYGIENE PRODUCT” MEANS A DISPOSABLE
OR REUSABLE PRODUCT USED FOR THE PURPOSE OF ABSORBING OR CONTAINING
MENSTRUAL BLOOD AND TISSUE MENSTRUATION OR VAGINAL DISCHARGE,
INCLUDING SANITARY PADS, TAMPONS, AND MENSTRUAL CUPS.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE BEGINNING APRIL 1, 2028, A A MANUFACTURER
OF MENSTRUAL HYGIENE PRODUCTS SHALL INCLUDE A LIST OF ALL INGREDIENTS
LISTED IN ORDER OF PREDOMINANCE AND DISPLAYED PROMINENTLY IN
CONSPICUOUS TYPE ON EACH CONSUMER–FACING PACKAGE OF MENSTRUAL
HYGIENE PRODUCTS SOLD IN THE STATE.
(2) A MANUFACTURER MAY LIST A PROPRIETARY INGREDIENT OR
COMBINATION OF INGREDIENTS BY THEIR CONFIDENTIAL SUBSTANCE BY ITS
COMMON NAME TO PROTECT CONFIDENTIALITY.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 241
(C) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN THE
MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) (1) A MANUFACTURER THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO
A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000.
(2) THE DIVISION SHALL PAY ALL PENALTIES COLLECTED BY THE
DIVISION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE WITH
THE INTENT THAT THE PENALTIES BE USED TO FULLY OFFSET ANY COSTS INCURRED
BY THE DIVISION IN CONNECTION WITH THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –